Washington statutes.
RCW 19.300.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Affiliate" means any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another company. Affiliate may also include a supplier, distributor, business partner, or any entity that effects, administers, or enforces a government or business transaction.

(2) "Identification device" means an item that uses radio frequency identification technology or facial recognition technology.

(3) "Issued" means either:

(a) To have provided the identification device to a person; or

(b) To have placed, requested the placement, or be the intended beneficiary of the placement of, the identification device in a product, product packaging, or product inventory mechanism.

(4) "Person" means a natural person who resides in Washington.

(5) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.255.010.

(6) "Radio frequency identification" means the use of electromagnetic radiating waves or reactive field coupling in the radio frequency portion of the spectrum to communicate to or from a tag through a variety of modulation and encoding schemes to uniquely read the identity of a radio frequency tag or other data stored on it.

(7) "Remotely reading" means that no physical contact is required between the identification device and the mechanical device that captures data.

(8) "Unique personal identifier number" means a randomly assigned string of numbers or symbols that is encoded on the identification device and is intended to identify the identification device.

[ 2009 c 66 s 1; 2008 c 138 s 2.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2009 c 66: "If any provision of this act is found to be in conflict with federal law or regulations, the conflicting provision of this act is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and that finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this act." [ 2009 c 66 s 4.]

Findings—2008 c 138: "The legislature finds that Washington state, from its inception, has recognized the importance of maintaining individual privacy. The legislature further finds that protecting the confidentiality and privacy of an individual's personal information, especially when collected from the individual without his or her knowledge or consent, is critical to maintaining the safety and well-being of its citizens. The legislature recognizes that inclusion of identification devices that broadcast data or enable data or information to be collected or scanned either secretly or remotely, or both, may greatly magnify the potential risk to individual privacy, safety, and economic well-being that can occur from unauthorized interception and use of personal information. The legislature further recognizes that these types of technologies, whether offered by the private sector or issued by the government, can be pervasive." [ 2008 c 138 s 1.]

Conflict with federal requirements—2008 c 138: "If any provision of this act is found to be in conflict with federal law or regulations, the conflicting provision of this act is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and that finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this act." [ 2008 c 138 s 4.]